District of Columbia statutes.
11-1302

Sessions.

The Small Claims and Conciliation Branch, with a judge in attendance, shall be open for the transaction of business on every day of the year except Saturday afternoons, Sundays, and legal holidays, and shall hold at least one evening session during each week.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 489, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1302.
1973 Ed., § 11-1302.